Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Covered animal" means any of the following animals, and hybrids thereof:(a) Elephantidae;(b) Felidae, including any hybrids thereof, but excluding domestic cats;(c) Nonhuman primate; and(d) Ursidae.(2) "Mobile or traveling housing facility" means a transporting vehicle such as a truck, trailer, or railway car, used to transport or house animals while traveling for exhibition or other performance.(3) "Performance" means any exhibition, public showing, presentation, display, exposition, fair, animal act, circus, ride, trade show, petting zoo, carnival, parade, race, or similar undertaking in which animals are required to perform tricks, give rides, or participate as accompaniments for the entertainment, amusement, or benefit of a live audience.(4) "Person" means individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations, or other legal entities, and agents of those entities.(5) "Traveling animal act" means any performance of animals where such animals are transported to, from, or between locations for the purpose of such performance, in a mobile or traveling housing facility.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall allow for the participation of a covered animal in a traveling animal act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This chapter shall not apply to a performance that: (1) Takes place at a nonmobile, permanent institution or other fixed facility licensed by the United States department of agriculture; and (2) is conducted by the nonmobile, permanent institution or fixed facility.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A violation of this chapter is a gross misdemeanor.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A city or county may adopt an ordinance governing traveling animal acts that is more restrictive than this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---